Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.895

Regulation of automatic number or location identification—Prohibited.

No city or town may enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation mandating automatic number identification or automatic location identification for a private telecommunications system or for a provider of private shared telecommunications services.

[ 1995 c 243 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1995 c 243: See notes following RCW 80.36.555.